North Dakota, session 69, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 39-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Out - of - state operator's license and nonoperator identification card - Prohibition .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an ou t - o f - state operator's license or
nonoperator identification card from a state that does not require proof of citizenship,
residency, or visa status to obtain an operator's license or nonoperator identification
card may not be used:
a. For any identification purposes in this state without a second form of
identification.
b. To operate a motor vehicle in this state without a second form of identification.
2. For purposes of this section, a second form of identification is limited to a valid:
a. United States passport;
b. United States passport card;
c. Birth certificate issued by a state of the United States;
d. Report of birth abroad issued by the United States;
e. Certification of naturalization;
f. Certificate of citizenship;
g. Permanent resident card;
h. Employment authorization card; or
i. Foreign passport and visa.
Page No. 1 25.0583.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. This section does not apply if the ou t - o f - state operator's license or nonoperator
identification card is compliant with the Real ID Act of 2005 [Pub. L. 109-13; 119 Stat .
302; 49 U.S.C. 30301].
4. This section does not apply to commercial operator licenses.
Page No. 2 25.0583.02000